Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.050

Contents of original estimates.

Original estimates shall show in detail the estimated cost of the work; the estimated quantities of each class of work; the estimated unit cost for each class; the estimated total cost for each class; the time limit, allowed for the completion of the work and the estimated dates of commencement and completion.

[ 1986 c 282 s 3; 1923 c 183 s 4; RRS s 10322-4.]